Utah statutes.
17-2-204.   Certification of election result to governor.

In an election held under Subsection 17-2-203(1), if it appears from the certified report that the lieutenant governor receives under Section 20A-4-304 that a majority of those voting in each county have voted in favor of the annexation, the lieutenant governor shall certify the result of the vote to the governor.

